Missouri, session 2026, HB3058.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 589, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to
be known as sections 589.770, 589.772, and 589.774, to read as follows:
589.770. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Convicted" or "conviction", a finding by a court that an individual is guilty
of a criminal offense through adjudication, or entry of a plea of guilty or no contest to
the charge by the offender;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of public safety;
(3) "Domestic abuse victim", a victim of a felony or class A misdemeanor offense
under chapter 565 involving physical injury, threat of physical injury, or sexual assault
committed by a family or household member, as defined in section 455.010;
(4) "Persistent domestic violence offender", a person who:
(a) Has been convicted in this state of an offense committed against a domestic
abuse victim; and
(b) Has at least one prior conviction for an offense committed against a domestic
abuse victim.
2. There is hereby created within the department of public safety a registry of
persistent domestic violence offenders. The Missouri state highway patrol shall
maintain the registry based on information supplied to the department as provided
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3058 2
under subsections 3 and 4 of this section and information available to the department
from the department of corrections and local law enforcement agencies. The
department shall make the registry available for public inquiry on the internet.
3. The registry shall consist of each persistent domestic violence offender's name,
date of birth, domestic violence offense, conviction date, county or counties of such
convictions, and a current photograph of the persistent domestic violence offender. If
available after reasonable inquiry, the court clerk shall provide the department with a
copy of each persistent domestic violence offender's driver's license, or other state or
federal identification, and such other identifying data as the department determines is
necessary to properly identify the persistent domestic violence offender and exclude
innocent persons. However, the registry available for public inquiry shall not include
any persistent domestic violence offender's address, Social Security number, driver's
license number, or any other state or federal identification number.
4. (1) If a person is convicted of an offense committed against a domestic abuse
victim and the person convicted has at least one prior conviction for an offense
committed against a domestic abuse victim, the court shall, upon proof of any prior
convictions committed against a domestic abuse victim, order the defendant to register
as a persistent domestic violence offender under this subsection.
(2) If a court orders a defendant to register under this section, the court clerk
shall forward to the department a certified copy of the qualifying conviction and the
date of birth of the defendant. The court clerk shall forward the information to the
department within seven days of the date of the conviction.
5. In addition to any other punishment that may be imposed for a conviction of
the offense, a defendant required to register under this section shall be assessed a
registration fee in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars, which shall be paid to the
clerk of the court imposing the sentence, who shall:
(1) Retain fifty dollars of the fee for the administration of this section, which
shall be reserved for the purposes authorized under this section at the end of each fiscal
year; and
(2) Remit one hundred dollars of the fee to the domestic violence prevention
fund established under section 589.774.
6. The department shall remove from the registry the name and other
identifying information of a persistent domestic violence offender required to register
under this section:
(1) Five years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense
committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has one prior conviction for
an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim;

HB 3058 3
(2) Seven years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense
committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has two prior convictions
for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim;
(3) Ten years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense
committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has three prior convictions
for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim; and
(4) Twenty years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense
committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has four or more prior
convictions for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim.
7. The provisions of this section shall apply only to persons convicted of an
offense committed against a domestic abuse victim that occurred on or after January 1,
2027; however, a prior conviction is not required to occur on or after such date.
8. A persistent domestic violence offender who knowingly and willfully fails to
register as required under this section shall be subject to:
(1) For a first violation of the requirement to register, a civil fine not exceeding
five hundred dollars, with written notification and fifteen days to correct such violation
before any penalty is imposed; and
(2) For a second or subsequent willful violation of the requirement to register, a
class A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment not to exceed one year and a fine not
to exceed one thousand dollars.
9. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
10. The department of public safety may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.

HB 3058 4
589.772. 1. There is hereby established within the department of public safety a
domestic violence prevention program to provide grants to eligible entities to fund
domestic violence prevention and intervention services. The department shall award
grants on the basis of available funds. The department shall establish eligibility criteria
for any grants administered under this section.
2. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
3. The director of the department of public safety shall promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
589.774. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Domestic Violence
Prevention Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under subdivision (2) of
subsection 5 of section 589.700, and any gifts, contributions, grants, bequests, or other
aid received from federal, private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely for funding and
administration of grants under the domestic violence prevention program established
under section 589.772.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.

HB 3058 5
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
✔